Utah statutes.
72-11-213.    Passenger ropeways -- Failure to comply with order -- Suspension -- Injunction.

(1)  If any operator fails to comply with a legal order or rule of the committee, the committee may:

(a)  suspend the registration of the affected passenger ropeway until the operator complies; or

(b)  bring injunctive proceedings in the district court of the judicial district in which the affected passenger ropeway is located to compel compliance.

(2)  In these proceedings the committee is not required to post bond.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 195, 1999 General Session

